California statutes. Civil Code
(1) The owner of the fee interest in property contracts for a work of improvement on the property with a contract price greater than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(2) The owner of a less than fee
 interest in property, including a leasehold interest, contracts for a work of improvement on the property with a contract price greater than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(b) For the purpose of this section:

(1) The owner of the fee interest in property is not deemed to be the owner of a less than fee interest by reason of a mortgage, deed of trust, ground lease, or other lien or encumbrance or right of occupancy that encumbers the fee interest.

(2) A lessee of real property is deemed to be the owner of a fee interest in the real property if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The initial term of the lease is at least 35 years.

(B) The lease covers one or more lawful
 parcels under the Subdivision Map Act, Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code, and any applicable local ordinance adopted under that act, in their entirety, including, but not limited to, a parcel approved pursuant to a certificate of compliance proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8702.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following works of improvement:

(a) A single-family residence, including a single-family residence located within a subdivision, and any associated fixed work that requires the services of a general engineering contractor as defined in Section 7056 of the Business and Professions Code. As used in this subdivision,
 “single-family residence” means a real property improvement used or intended to be used as a dwelling unit for one family.

(b) A housing development eligible for a density bonus under Section 65915 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8704.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following owners:

(a) A qualified publicly traded company or a wholly owned subsidiary of a qualified publicly traded company, if the obligations of the subsidiary pursuant to the contract for the work of improvement are guaranteed by the parent. As used in this subdivision, “qualified publicly traded company” means a
 company having a class of equity securities listed for trading on the New York Stock Exchange, the American Stock Exchange, or the NASDAQ stock market, and the nonsubordinated debt securities of which are rated as “investment grade” by either Fitch ICBA, Inc., Moody’s Investor Services, Inc., Standard & Poor’s Ratings Services, or a similar statistical rating organization that is nationally recognized for rating the creditworthiness of a publicly traded company. If at any time before final payment of all amounts due pursuant to the contract the nonsubordinated debt securities of the qualified publicly traded company are downgraded to below “investment grade” by any of those rating organizations, the owner is no longer exempt from this chapter.

(b) A qualified private company or a wholly owned subsidiary of a qualified private company, if the obligations of the subsidiary pursuant to the contract for the work of improvement are guaranteed by
 the parent. As used in this subdivision, “qualified private company” means a company that has no equity securities listed for trading on the New York Stock Exchange, the American Stock Exchange, or the NASDAQ stock market, and that has a net worth determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in excess of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000). If at any time before final payment of all amounts due pursuant to the contract the net worth of the qualified private company is reduced below that level, the owner is no longer exempt from this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Security Requirement [8710. - 8716.]

8710.

An owner described in subdivision (a) of Section 8700 shall provide the direct contractor all of the following:

(a) Security for the owner’s payment obligation pursuant to the contract. The security shall be used only if the owner defaults on the payment obligation to the direct contractor. This subdivision does not apply to an owner that is the majority owner
 of the direct contractor.

(b) A copy, certified by the county recorder, of any recorded mortgage or deed of trust that secures the construction loan of a lending institution for the work of improvement, disclosing the amount of the loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8712.

If an owner fails to provide or maintain the security required by this chapter, the direct contractor may give the owner notice demanding security. The notice shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1. If the owner does not provide or maintain the security within 10 days after notice demanding security is given, the direct contractor may suspend work until the owner provides
 or maintains the security.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8714.

It is against public policy to waive the provisions of this chapter by contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8716.

This chapter does not affect any statute providing for mechanics liens, stop payment notices, bond remedies, or prompt payment rights of a subcontractor, including the direct contractor’s payment responsibilities under Section 7108.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Form of Security [8720. - 8730.]

8720.

An owner shall provide security by any of the following means:

(a) A bond that satisfies Section 8722.

(b) An irrevocable letter of credit that satisfies Section 8724.

(c) An escrow account that satisfies Section
 8726.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8722.

A bond under this chapter shall satisfy all of the following requirements:

(a) The bond shall be executed by an admitted surety insurer that is either listed in the Department of the Treasury’s Listing of Approved Sureties (Department Circular 570) or that has an A.M. Best rating of A or better and has an underwriting limitation, under Section 12090 of the
 Insurance Code, greater than the amount of the bond.

(b) The bond shall be in an amount not less than 15 percent of the contract price for the work of improvement or, if the work of improvement is to be substantially completed within six months after the commencement of work, not less than 25 percent of the contract price.

(c) The bond shall be conditioned for payment on default by the owner of any undisputed amount pursuant to the contract that is due and payable for more than 30 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8724.

An irrevocable letter of credit under this chapter shall satisfy all of the following requirements:

(a) The letter of credit shall be issued by a financial institution, as defined in Section 5107 of the Financial Code, inuring to the benefit of the direct contractor.

(b) The letter of credit
 shall be in an amount not less than 15 percent of the contract price for the work of improvement or, if the work of improvement is to be substantially completed within six months after the commencement of work, not less than 25 percent of the contract price.

(c) The maturity date and other terms of the letter of credit shall be determined by agreement between the owner, the direct contractor, and the financial institution, except that the owner shall maintain the letter of credit in effect until the owner has satisfied its payment obligation to the direct contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8726.

An escrow account under this chapter shall satisfy all of the following requirements:

(a) The account shall be designated as a “construction security escrow account.”

(b) The account shall be located in this state and maintained with an escrow agent licensed under the Escrow Law, Division 6
 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Financial Code, or with any person exempt from the Escrow Law under paragraph (1) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 17006 of the Financial Code.

(c) The owner shall deposit funds in the account in the amount provided in Section 8728. This chapter does not require a construction lender to agree to deposit proceeds of a construction loan in the account.

(d) The owner shall grant the direct contractor a perfected, first priority security interest in the account and in all funds deposited by the owner in the account and in their proceeds, established to the reasonable satisfaction of the direct contractor, which may be by a written opinion of legal counsel for the owner.

(e) The funds on deposit in the account shall be the sole property of the owner, subject to the security
 interest of the direct contractor. The owner and the direct contractor shall instruct the escrow holder to hold the funds on deposit in the account for the purpose of perfecting the direct contractor’s security interest in the account and to disburse those funds only on joint authorization of the owner and the direct contractor, or pursuant to a court order that is binding on both of them.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8728.

The following provisions govern a deposit to or disbursement from a construction security escrow account under this chapter:

(a) Before the commencement of work the owner shall make an initial deposit to the account in an amount not less than 15 percent of the contract price for the work of improvement or, if the work of improvement is to be substantially
 completed within six months after the commencement of work, not less than 25 percent of the contract price.

(b) If the contract provides for a retention to be withheld from a periodic payment to the direct contractor, the owner shall deposit to the account the amount withheld as retention at the time the owner makes the corresponding payment to the direct contractor from which the retention is withheld.

(c) The amount required to be maintained on deposit shall not exceed the total amount remaining to be paid to the direct contractor pursuant to the contract or as adjusted by agreement between the owner and the direct contractor. If the amount on deposit equals or exceeds the total amount remaining to be paid to the direct contractor, the owner and the direct contractor shall authorize disbursement to the direct contractor for progress payments then due the direct contractor, but a
 party is not obligated to authorize disbursement that would cause the amount remaining on deposit following the disbursement to be less than the total amount remaining to be paid to the direct contractor.

(d) The owner and the direct contractor shall authorize the disbursement to the owner of any funds remaining on deposit after the direct contractor has been paid all amounts due pursuant to the contract. The owner and the direct contractor shall authorize the disbursement of funds on deposit pursuant to a court order that is binding on both of them. The owner and the direct contractor may agree in the contract to additional conditions for the disbursement of funds on deposit, except that the conditions may not cause the amount remaining on deposit to be less than the amount required under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8730.

If the contract price for a work of improvement is not a fixed price, the amount of security provided under this chapter shall be the guaranteed maximum price or, if there is no guaranteed maximum price, the owner’s and direct contractor’s good faith estimate of the reasonable value of the work to be provided pursuant to the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Prompt Payment [8800. - 8851.]



  ARTICLE 1. Progress Payment [8800. - 8802.]

8800.

(a) Except as otherwise agreed in writing by the owner and direct contractor, the owner shall pay the direct contractor, within 30 days after notice demanding payment pursuant to the contract is given, any progress payment due as to which there is no good faith dispute between them. The notice given shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1.

(b) If there is a good faith dispute between the owner and direct contractor as to a progress payment due, the owner may withhold from the progress payment an amount not in excess of 150 percent of the disputed amount.

(c) An owner that violates this section is liable to the direct contractor for a penalty of 2 percent per month on the amount wrongfully withheld, in place of any interest otherwise due. In an action for collection of the amount wrongfully withheld, the prevailing party is entitled to costs and a reasonable attorney’s fee.

(d) This section does not supersede any requirement of Article 2 (commencing with Section 8810) relating to the withholding of a retention.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8802.

(a) This section applies to a contract between a public utility and a direct contractor for all or part of a work of improvement.

(b) Unless the direct contractor and a subcontractor otherwise agree in writing, within 21 days after receipt of a progress payment from the public utility the direct contractor shall pay the subcontractor the
 amount allowed the direct contractor on account of the work performed by the subcontractor to the extent of the subcontractor’s interest in the work. If there is a good faith dispute over all or part of the amount due on a progress payment from the direct contractor to a subcontractor, the direct contractor may withhold an amount not in excess of 150 percent of the disputed amount.

(c) A direct contractor that violates this section is liable to the subcontractor for a penalty of 2 percent of the disputed amount due per month for every month that payment is not made. In an action for collection of the amount wrongfully withheld, the prevailing party is entitled to costs and a reasonable attorney’s fee.

(d) This section does not limit or impair a contractual, administrative, or judicial remedy otherwise available to a contractor or subcontractor in a dispute involving late payment
 or nonpayment by the contractor or deficient performance or nonperformance by the subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Retention Payment [8810. - 8822.]

8810.

This article governs a retention payment withheld by an owner from a direct contractor or by a direct contractor from a subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8811.

(a) This section is applicable to a contract relating to a private work of improvement entered into on or after January 1, 2026.

(b) (1) (A) A retention payment withheld from a payment by an owner from the direct contractor, by the direct contractor from any subcontractor, and by a subcontractor from any subcontractor thereunder, for a private work of improvement, shall not exceed 5 percent of the payment.

(B) In no event shall the total retention proceeds withheld exceed 5 percent of the contract price.

(C) In a contract between the direct contractor and a subcontractor, and
 in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention payment withheld shall not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the owner and the direct contractor.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to a direct contractor or subcontractor if the direct contractor or subcontractor provides written notice to a subcontractor before, or at, the time that the bid is requested that a faithful performance and payment bond shall be required, and a subcontractor subsequently fails to furnish to the direct contractor or subcontractor a performance and payment bond issued by an admitted surety insurer.

(3) Paragraph (1) does not apply to an owner, direct contractor, or subcontractor on a residential project if the project is not mixed-use and does not exceed four stories.

(c) In any action to enforce the provisions of this section, a court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   (SB 61)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8812.

(a) If an owner withholds a retention from a direct contractor, the owner shall, within 45 days after completion of the work of improvement, pay the retention to the contractor.

(b) If part of a work of improvement ultimately will become the property of a public entity, the owner may condition payment of a retention allocable to that part
 on acceptance of the part by the public entity.

(c) If there is a good faith dispute between the owner and direct contractor as to a retention payment due, the owner may withhold from final payment an amount not in excess of 150 percent of the disputed amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8814.

(a) If a direct contractor has withheld a retention from one or more subcontractors, the direct contractor shall, within 10 days after receiving all or part of a retention payment, pay to each subcontractor from whom retention has been withheld that subcontractor’s share of the payment.

(b) If a retention received by the direct contractor
 is specifically designated for a particular subcontractor, the direct contractor shall pay the retention payment to the designated subcontractor, if consistent with the terms of the subcontract.

(c) If a good faith dispute exists between the direct contractor and a subcontractor, the direct contractor may withhold from the retention to the subcontractor an amount not in excess of 150 percent of the estimated value of the disputed amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8816.

(a) If the direct contractor gives the owner, or a subcontractor gives the direct contractor, notice that work in dispute has been completed in accordance with the contract, the owner or direct contractor shall within 10 days give notice advising the notifying party of the acceptance or rejection of the disputed work. Both notices shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section
 8100) of Title 1.

(b) Within 10 days after acceptance of disputed work, the owner or direct contractor shall pay the portion of the retention relating to the disputed work.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8818.

If an owner or direct contractor does not make a retention payment within the time required by this article:

(a) The owner or direct contractor is liable to the person to which payment is owed for a penalty of 2 percent per month on the amount wrongfully withheld, in place of any interest otherwise due.

(b) In an action for collection of the amount wrongfully withheld, the prevailing party is entitled to costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8820.

It is against public policy to waive the provisions of this article by contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8822.

This article does not apply to a retention payment withheld by a lender pursuant to a construction loan agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Stop Work Notice [8830. - 8848.]

8830.

“Stop work notice” means notice given under this article by a direct contractor to an owner that the contractor will stop work if the amount owed the contractor is not paid within 10 days after notice is given.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8832.

If a direct contractor is not paid the amount due pursuant to a written contract within 35 days after the date payment is due under the contract, and there is no dispute as to the satisfactory performance of the contractor, the contractor may give the owner a stop work notice. The notice shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8834.

A direct contractor that gives an owner a stop work notice shall give the following additional notice:

(a) At least five days before giving the stop work notice, the contractor shall post notice of intent to give a stop work notice. The notice shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1. In addition to posting the
 notice pursuant to Section 8114, the notice shall also be posted at the main office of the site, if one exists.

(b) At the same time the contractor gives the stop work notice, the contractor shall give a copy of the stop work notice to all subcontractors with whom the contractor has a direct contractual relationship on the work of improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8836.

Within five days after receipt of a stop work notice from a direct contractor, the owner shall give a copy of the notice to the construction lender, if any. The copy of the notice shall be given in compliance with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8838.

(a) The direct contractor or the direct contractor’s surety, or a subcontractor or a subcontractor’s surety, is not liable for delay or damage that the owner or a contractor of a subcontractor may suffer as a result of the direct contractor giving a stop work notice and subsequently stopping work for nonpayment, if the notice and posting requirements of this article are satisfied.

(b) A direct contractor’s or original subcontractor’s liability to a subcontractor or material supplier after the direct contractor stops work under this article is limited to the amount the subcontractor or material supplier could otherwise recover under this title for work provided up to the date the subcontractor or material supplier ceases work, subject to the following exceptions:

(1) The direct contractor’s or original subcontractor’s liability continues for work provided up to and including the 10-day notice period and not beyond.

(2) This subdivision does not limit liability for custom work, including materials that have been fabricated, manufactured, or ordered to specifications that are unique to the job.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8840.

On resolution of the claim in the stop work notice or the direct contractor’s cancellation of the stop work notice, the contractor shall post, and give subcontractors with whom the contractor has a direct contractual relationship on the work of improvement, notice of the resolution or cancellation. The notice shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8100) of Title 1. In addition to posting
 the notice pursuant to Section 8114, the notice shall also be posted at the main office of the site, if one exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8842.

A direct contractor’s right to stop work under this article is in addition to other rights the direct contractor may have under the law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8844.

(a) If payment of the amount claimed is not made within 10 days after a stop work notice is given, the direct contractor, the direct contractor’s surety, or an owner may in an expedited proceeding in the superior court in the county in which the private work of improvement is located, seek a judicial determination of liability for the amount due.

(b) The expedited proceeding shall be set for hearing or trial at the earliest possible date in order that it shall be quickly heard and determined, and shall take precedence over all other cases except older matter of the same character and other matters to which special precedence has been given.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8846.

It is against public policy to waive the provisions of this article by contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8848.

(a) This article applies to a contract entered into on or after January 1, 1999.

(b) This article does not apply to a retention withheld by a lender pursuant to a construction loan agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Claims and Disputes  [8850. - 8851.]

8850.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following: 

(1) It is in the best interests of the state and its citizens to ensure that all construction business performed on a private works project in the state that is complete and not in dispute is paid in full and in a timely manner. 

(2) Delays in payment for works of improvement and site improvements impose significant financial hardships on contractors, particularly small businesses, disadvantaged business enterprises, and disabled veteran business enterprises.
 

(3) The lack of clear procedures for resolving disputes related to change orders often leads to costly litigation where a predetermined method could avoid such costs. 

(4) Prompt and fair payment promotes economic stability within the construction industry and ensures efficient project completion. 

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall apply to any claim by a contractor, or where authorized pursuant to this article, a subcontractor, in connection to a work of improvement or site improvement.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms apply:

(1) “Claim” means a separate
 demand by a contractor, or where authorized pursuant to this article, a subcontractor, sent by registered mail or certified mail with return receipt requested, for one or more of the following: 

(A) A time extension, including, without limitation, for relief from damages or penalties for delay assessed by an owner under contract for a work of improvement or site improvement.

(B) Payment by the owner of money or damages arising from work done by, or on behalf of, the contractor pursuant to the contract for a work of improvement or site improvement project and payment for which is not otherwise expressly provided or to which the claimant is not otherwise entitled.

(C) Payment of an amount that is disputed by the owner.

(2) (A) “Owner” means the owner who causes a building, improvement, or structure to be constructed, altered, or repaired, or that person’s successor in interest at the
 date a notice of completion is recorded, whether the interest or estate of the owner be in fee, as vendee under a contract of purchase, as lessee, or other interest or estate less than the fee. Where the interest or estate is held by two or more persons as joint tenants or tenants in common, any one or more of the cotenants may be deemed to be the “owner” within the meaning of this section.

(B) “Owner” shall not include a state agency, department, office, division, bureau, board, or commission, the California State University, the University of California, a city, including a charter city,
 county, including a charter county, city and county, including a charter city and county, district, special district, public authority, political subdivision, public corporation, or nonprofit transit corporation wholly owned by a public agency and formed to carry out the purposes of the public agency.

(C) An owner shall have the right to a designated representative. 

(3) (A) “Project manager” means a person, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that is designated by the owner to direct construction and represent the owner during the performance of the services covered under the construction contract and is authorized to make changes, adjustments, and interpretations of the contract in order to facilitate the completion of the project.

(B) In the absence of the appointment of a project manager by the owner, the owner shall serve as project manager on a project.

(d) (1) (A) Upon receipt of a claim pursuant to this section, the owner to which the claim applies shall perform a reasonable review of the claim and, within a period not to exceed
 30 days, shall provide the claimant a written statement identifying what portion of the claim is disputed and what portion of the claim is undisputed. 

(B) The claimant shall furnish reasonable documentation to support the claim.

(2) Upon receipt of a claim, an owner and a contractor may, by mutual agreement, extend the time period provided in
 this subdivision in writing.

(3) Payment of any undisputed portion of the claim shall be processed and made within 60 days after the owner issues its written statement. 

(e) (1) If the claimant disputes all or any portion of the owner’s written
 response to the claim, or if the owner fails to respond to a claim issued within the timeframe prescribed, the claimant may demand in writing an informal conference to meet and confer for settlement of the issues in dispute. 

(2) Upon receipt of a demand in writing sent by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested, the owner shall schedule a meet and confer conference with the claimant within 30 days for settlement of the dispute.

(3) Within 10 business days following the conclusion of the meet and confer conference, if the claim or any portion of the claim remains in dispute, the owner shall provide the claimant a written statement identifying the portion of the claim that remains in dispute and the portion that is undisputed. 

 (4) Payment of any undisputed portion of the claim shall be processed and made within 60 days after the owner issues its written statement. 

(f) (1) If, following the informal conference, there remains any disputed portion of the claim, the remaining disputed portion of the claim shall be submitted to nonbinding mediation, with the owner and the claimant sharing the associated costs equally. 

(2) The owner and claimant shall mutually agree to a mediator within 10 business days after the disputed portion
 of the claim has been identified in writing. 

(3) (A) If the parties cannot agree upon a
 mediator within the time allotted, the contractor may select the mediator to be used.

(B) If the owner refuses mediation, the contractor may carry out the process described in subdivision (k). 

(4) If mediation is unsuccessful, the parts of the claim remaining in dispute shall be subject to the dispute resolution procedures elected in the written contract of the parties, or, if no such election exists, by final judgment or by operation of law.

(g) (1) Failure by the owner to respond to a claim within the time periods described in this section or to otherwise meet the requirements of this section shall result in the claim being deemed denied in its entirety. 

(2) A claim that is denied by reason of the owner’s failure to have responded to a claim, or its failure to otherwise meet the time requirements of the section, shall not constitute an adverse finding with regard to the merits of the claim or the responsibility or qualifications of the claim. 

(h) (1) Undisputed amounts not paid in a timely manner as required by this section shall bear interest at 2 percent per month.

(2) Disputed amounts which are later found to be owed through the dispute resolution procedures elected in the written contract of the parties, or, if no such election exists, by final judgment or by operation of law, shall bear interest at 2 percent per month, beginning from the date on which
 those amounts would have been due had they not been disputed.

(i) Nothing in this section shall prevent either party from submitting, or otherwise limit the applicability of, a statutory offer of settlement under Section 998 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 

(j) (1) If a subcontractor or a lower tier subcontractor lacks legal standing to assert a claim against an owner because privity of contract does not exist, except as provided in paragraph (4),
 the contractor shall present to the owner a claim on behalf of a subcontractor or lower tier subcontractor. 

(2) A subcontractor may request in writing, either on their own behalf or on behalf of a lower tier subcontractor, that the contractor present a claim for work that was performed by the subcontractor or by a lower tier subcontractor on behalf of the subcontractor. 

(3) (A) The subcontractor requesting that the claim be presented to the owner shall furnish the contractor with timely and reasonable documentation to support the subcontractor’s claim to enable the contractor to meet their obligations under subdivision (d) and shall thereafter cooperate with the contractor in the informal conference, mediation, and dispute resolution processes required
 pursuant to this section relating to the subcontractor’s claim.

(B) The contractor shall exercise good faith in fulfilling their obligations on behalf of the subcontractor under subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) and shall make no settlement of any claim to which the subcontractor does not approve, in writing. 

(4) Within 30 days of receipt of this written request, the contractor shall notify the subcontractor in writing as to whether the contractor presented the claim to the owner and, if the contractor did not present the claim, provide the subcontractor with a statement of the reasons for not doing so.

(5) Nothing in this subdivision precludes a subcontractor from exercising its lien rights and its stop work notice
 rights. 

(k) The contractor and subcontractors shall have the right to suspend
 performance of their work, without penalty, until payment is received if the following procedure is followed:

(1) The owner is informed by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested, that payment is due pursuant to this section, or where the claim is deemed denied pursuant to subdivision (g).

(2) Thirty
 days after the notice that payment was due pursuant to paragraph (1) is sent to the owner, the contractor or subcontractor sends a 10-day written notice of intent to stop work to the owner by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested.

(l) Any disputed amount which the owner, at any point, agrees to pay, or is found to owe through dispute resolution, by final judgment, or by operation of law, shall, from the date of the agreement or finding, be considered an undisputed amount for the purpose of any timelines or processes established under this article.

(m) (1) A waiver of the rights granted by this section is void and contrary to public policy.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), all of the following apply:

(A) Upon receipt of a claim, the parties may mutually agree to waive, in writing, the informal conference and mediation provisions in this section and proceed directly to the commencement of a civil action or binding arbitration, as applicable.

(B) Owners, contractors, and subcontractors may agree to reasonable change order, claim, and dispute resolution procedures and requirements in